Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202085-2002
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Community College Gap Assistance Program Act:

(1) Committee means the Nebraska Community College Student Performance and Occupational Education Grant Committee;

(2) Community college gap assistance program means the program created pursuant to section 85-2003;

(3) Eligible program means a program offered by a community college that (a) either (i) is not offered for credit and has a duration of not less than sixteen contact hours in length or (ii) is offered for credit but is of insufficient clock, semester, or quarter hours to be eligible for Federal Pell Grants, (b) is aligned with training programs with stackable credentials that lead to a program awarding college credit, an associate's degree, a diploma, or a certificate in an in-demand occupation, and (c) does any of the following:

(i) Offers a state, national, or locally recognized certificate;

(ii) Offers preparation for a professional examination or licensure;

(iii) Provides endorsement for an existing credential or license;

(iv) Represents recognized skill standards defined by an industrial sector; or

(v) Offers a similar credential or training; and

(4) In-demand occupation means:

(a) Financial services;

(b) Transportation, warehousing, and distribution logistics;

(c) Precision metals manufacturing;

(d) Biosciences;

(e) Renewable energy;

(f) Agriculture and food processing;

(g) Business management and administrative services;

(h) Software and computer services;

(i) Research, development, and engineering services;

(j) Health services;

(k) Hospitality and tourism; and

(l) Any other industry designated as an in-demand occupation by the committee.

Laws 2015, LB519, § 28;

Laws 2019, LB180, § 1.